Utah statutes.
26-51-201.   Scientific standards for methamphetamine decontamination.

(1)  The department shall make rules adopting scientifically-based standards for methamphetamine decontamination.

(2)  A local health department, as defined in Title 26A, Local Health Authorities, shall follow rules made by the department under Subsection (1) in administering Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 9, Illegal Drug Operations Site Reporting and Decontamination Act.

